test/src/morphology/V-oudw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - oudõ: # Verb 48 'eng /est haududa/fin' - full paradigm
     oudõ+V+Inf: oudõ
     oudõ+V+Ger: oudõs
     oudõ+V+Sup: oudõm
     oudõ+V+Sup+Ine: oudõmõs
     oudõ+V+Sup+Ela: oudõmõst
     oudõ+V+Sup+Tra: oudõmõks
     oudõ+V+Sup+Abe: oudõmõt
     oudõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ōdõb
     oudõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oudõt
     oudõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oudõbõd
     oudõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ōdiz
     oudõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ōdizt, ōdiztõ]
     oudõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ōdizt, ōdiztõ]
     oudõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: oud
     oudõ+V+Cond+Sg3: oudõks
     oudõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oud
     oudõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: oud
     oudõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: oudõgid
     oudõ+V+Jus+Sg3: oudõg
     oudõ+V+Quo+Sg3: oudiji
     oudõ+V+ActPrfPrc: oudõn
     oudõ+V+PssPrfPrc: oudtõd
